Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 10. Virginia Port Authority.
§ 62.1-132.3:2.
Port of Virginia Economic and Infrastructure Development Grant Fund and Program.

From such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly and any gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources, and any funds transferred at the request of the Executive Director from the Port Opportunity Fund created pursuant to §

62.1-132.3:1

, there is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting, permanent fund to be known as the Port of Virginia Economic and Infrastructure Development Grant Fund (the Fund), to be administered by the Virginia Port Authority. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest thereon, shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund, which shall be in the form of grants, shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Executive Director. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of grants to qualified applicants to the Port of Virginia Economic and Infrastructure Development Grant Program.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“New, permanent full-time position” means a job of an indefinite duration, created by a qualified company as a result of operations within the Commonwealth, requiring a minimum of 35 hours of an employee’s time per week for the entire normal year of the company’s operations, which normal year shall consist of at least 48 weeks, or a position of indefinite duration that requires a minimum of 35 hours of an employee’s time per week for the portion of the taxable year in which the employee was initially hired for the qualified company’s location within the Commonwealth. “New, permanent full-time position” includes security positions as required within a foreign trade zone, established pursuant to Foreign Trade Zones Act of 1934, as amended (19 U.S.C. §§ 81a through 81u). “New, permanent full-time position” does not include seasonal or temporary positions, jobs created when a position is shifted from an existing location in the Commonwealth to the qualified company’s new or expanded location, or positions in building and grounds maintenance or other positions that are ancillary to the principal activities performed by the employees at the qualified company’s location within the Commonwealth.“Qualified company” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other business entity that (i) locates or expands a facility within the Commonwealth; (ii) creates at least 25 new, permanent full-time positions for qualified full-time employees at a facility within the Commonwealth during its first year of operation or during the year when the expansion occurs; (iii) is involved in maritime commerce or exports or imports manufactured goods through the Port of Virginia; and (iv) is engaged in one or more of the following: the distribution, freight forwarding, freight handling, goods processing, manufacturing, warehousing, crossdocking, transloading, or wholesaling of goods exported and imported through the Port of Virginia; ship building and ship repair; dredging; marine construction; or offshore energy exploration or extraction.“Qualified full-time employee” means an employee filling a new, permanent full-time position in the qualified company’s location within the Commonwealth. A “qualified full-time employee” does not include an employee (i) for whom a tax credit was previously earned pursuant to §

58.1-439

or

58.1-439.12:06

by a related party as listed in § 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or by a trade or business under common control as defined in regulations issued pursuant to § 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code; (ii) who was previously employed in the same job function at an existing location in the Commonwealth by a related party as listed in § 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code; or (iii) whose job function was previously performed at a different location in the Commonwealth by an employee of a related party as listed in § 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or a trade or business under common control as defined in regulations issued pursuant to § 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Beginning January 1, 2014, but not later than June 30, 2025, and subject to appropriation, any qualified company that locates or expands a facility within the Commonwealth shall be eligible to apply for a one-time grant from the Fund, in an amount determined as follows:

One thousand dollars per new, permanent full-time position if the qualified company creates at least 25 new, permanent full-time positions for qualified full-time employees during its first year of operation or during the year in which the expansion occurs;

Fifteen hundred dollars per new, permanent full-time position if the qualified company creates at least 50 new, permanent full-time positions for qualified full-time employees during its first year of operation or during the year in which the expansion occurs;

Two thousand dollars per new, permanent full-time position if the qualified company creates at least 75 new, permanent full-time positions for qualified full-time employees during its first year of operation or during the year in which the expansion occurs; and

Three thousand dollars per new, permanent full-time position if the qualified company creates at least 100 new, permanent full-time positions for qualified full-time employees during its first year of operation or during the year in which the expansion occurs.

The maximum amount of grant allowable per qualified company in any given fiscal year is $500,000. The maximum amount of grants allowable among all qualified companies in any given fiscal year is $5 million.

To qualify for a grant pursuant to this section, a qualified company must apply for the grant not later than March 31 in the year immediately following the location or expansion of a facility within the Commonwealth pursuant to an application process developed by the Virginia Port Authority. Within 90 days after the filing deadline, the Executive Director shall certify to the Comptroller and the qualified company the amount of grant to which the qualified company is entitled under this section. Payment of each grant shall be made by check issued by the State Treasurer on warrant of the Comptroller within 60 days of such certification and in the order that each completed eligible application is received. In the event that the amount of eligible grants requested in a fiscal year exceeds the funds available in the Fund or $5 million, such grants shall be paid in the next fiscal year in which funds are available.

A qualified company that has received a grant in accordance with the requirements provided in this section shall be eligible for a second grant from the Fund if it (i) locates or expands an additional facility in a separate location, as determined by the Virginia Port Authority, within the Commonwealth; (ii) creates at least 300 new, permanent full-time positions at the additional facility over and above those agreed upon in the qualified company’s original memorandum of understanding with the Virginia Port Authority; and (iii) increases cargo volumes through the Port of Virginia by at least five percent, not including any volume increase resulting from the original grant, from the additional facility. If the qualified company satisfies the requirements provided in this subsection and receives a grant consistent with the requirements of this section, then the qualified company shall enter into another separate memorandum of understanding with the Virginia Port Authority as provided in subsection G.

Prior to receipt of a grant, the qualified company shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Virginia Port Authority establishing the requirements for maintaining the number of new, permanent full-time positions for qualified employees at the qualified company’s location within the Commonwealth. If the number of new, permanent full-time positions for any of the three years immediately following receipt of a grant falls below the number of new, permanent full-time positions created during the year for which the grant is claimed, the amount of the grant must be recalculated using the decreased number of new, permanent full-time positions and the qualified company shall repay the difference.

No qualified company shall apply for a grant nor shall one be awarded under this section to an otherwise qualified company if (i) a credit pursuant to §

58.1-439

or

58.1-439.12:06

is claimed for the same employees or for capital expenditures at the same facility by the qualified company, by a related party as listed in § 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, or by a trade or business under common control as defined in regulations issued pursuant to § 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or (ii) the qualified company was a party to a reorganization as defined in § 368(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, and any corporation involved in the reorganization as defined in § 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code previously received a grant under this section for the same facility or operations.

The Virginia Port Authority, with the assistance of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership, shall develop guidelines establishing procedures and requirements for qualifying for the grant, including the affirmative determination that each applicant is a qualified company, as defined above, engaged in a port-related business. The guidelines shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). For the purposes of administering this grant program, the Virginia Port Authority and the Department of Taxation shall exchange information regarding whether a qualified company, a related party as listed in § 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a trade or business under common control as defined in regulations issued pursuant to § 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code has claimed a credit pursuant to §

58.1-439

or

58.1-439.12:06

for the same employees or for capital expenditures at the same facility.

History.

2012, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3; 2013, cc. 549, 806; 2014, c. 470; 2015, c. 246; 2019, c. 565.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, § 4-14.00 of enactment clause 1, made this section effective on July 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, c. 549, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”

Acts 2013, c. 549, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly determines that the requirements of the second enactment of this act have been met.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 549 and 806 are nearly identical, and in subsection B, inserted “Page,” “Shenandoah,” and “Franklin”; and deleted a section symbol preceding “58.1-439” in the paragraph defining “Qualified full-time employee.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 470 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 246 added subsection F; and redesignated former subsections F through H as G through I.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 565 substituted “2025” for “2020” in subsection C

§ 62.1-132.3:3.
Virginia Waterway Maintenance Fund.

From such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly and any gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources, there is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting, permanent fund to be known as the Virginia Waterway Maintenance Fund (the Fund), to be administered by the Authority. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest thereon, shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund, which shall be in the form of grants, shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Executive Director. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of awarding grants to applicants to the Virginia Waterway Maintenance Grant Program pursuant to §

62.1-132.3:4

.

History.

2018, c. 642.

§ 62.1-132.3:4.
Virginia Waterway Maintenance Grant Program.

Once each fiscal year, the Authority shall award a grant of funds to a qualified applicant or applicants to support a dredging project or projects that have been approved by the Authority. The source of the grant funds shall be the Virginia Waterway Maintenance Fund created pursuant to §

62.1-132.3:3

. Applicants shall be limited to political subdivisions and the governing bodies of Virginia localities.

The Authority shall develop guidelines establishing an application process, procedures for evaluating the feasibility of a proposed dredging project, and procedures for awarding grants. The guidelines and procedures shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). The guidelines and procedures shall provide that:

The Authority shall evaluate each application to determine its completeness, the sufficiency of its justification for the proposed project, the status of any necessary permits, the adequacy of its project management organization, and the potential beneficial use of dredged materials for the purpose of mitigation of coastal erosion, flooding, or other purposes for the common good.

The Authority shall not require any level of matching contributions from the applicant.

No award of a grant shall support any dredging project for a solely privately owned marina or dock. However, the Authority may award a grant to a political subdivision or governing body for the dredging of a waterway channel with a bottom that is privately owned if such political subdivision or governing body holds a lease of such bottom with a term of 25 years or more.

Prior to receipt of a grant, the applicant shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Authority establishing the requirements for the use of the grant funds.

Projects for which the Authority may award grant funding include (i) feasibility and cost evaluations, pre-project engineering studies, and project permitting and contracting costs for a waterway project conducted by the Commonwealth; (ii) the state portion of a nonfederal sponsor funding requirement for a federal project, which may include the beneficial use of dredged materials that are not covered by federal funding; (iii) the Commonwealth’s maintenance of shallow-draft navigable waterway channel maintenance dredging and the construction and management of areas for the placement of dredged material; and (iv) the beneficial use, for environmental restoration and the mitigation of coastal erosion or flooding, of dredged materials from waterway projects conducted by the Commonwealth.

History.

2018, c. 642; 2022, c. 282.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 282, added the second sentence of subdivision B 3.

§ 62.1-132.4.
Rates and rate structures.

The Authority shall have power to establish a traffic bureau or other office to investigate and seek improvement in any rates, rate structures, practices, and charges affecting or tending to affect the commerce of the ports of the Commonwealth. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Authority shall not disclose proprietary information and data furnished to it in confidence, including but not limited to customer contracts, agreements, or information; ship tally sheets; ship manifests; information relating to tonnages and cargoes; annual budgets; and other information furnished to it by any entity, including but not limited to any entity operating a terminal on behalf of the Virginia Port Authority.

History.

1981, c. 589; 1997, c. 197; 2013, cc. 762, 794.

Cross references.

As to records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.6

.

As to personal information systems which are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and substituted “customer contracts, agreements, or information; ship tally sheets; ship manifests; information relating to tonnages and cargoes; annual budgets; and other information furnished” for “ship tally sheets, ship manifests, information relating to tonnages and cargoes, information, and annual budgets furnished” in the second sentence.

§ 62.1-132.5.
Planning.

The Authority shall initiate and further plans for the development of the ports of the Commonwealth, and, to this end, shall keep informed as to the present requirements and likely future needs of those ports.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.6.
Powers not restrictive; exemptions from Public Procurement Act and the Virginia Personnel Act.

The Authority shall have the power to perform any act or carry out any function not inconsistent with state law, whether included in the provisions of this chapter, which may be, or tend to be, useful in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to the Authority in the exercise of any of its powers in accordance with this chapter, provided the Authority implement, by policy or regulation adopted by the Board of Commissioners, procedures to ensure fairness and competitiveness in the procurement of goods and services and in the administration of its capital outlay program. This exemption shall be applicable only so long as such policies and procedures meeting the requirements remain in effect.

The provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall not apply to the Authority.

Additionally, the provisions of §§

2.2-1124

,

2.2-1131.1

,

2.2-1136

,

2.2-1149

,

2.2-1150

, and

2.2-1153

through

2.2-1156

shall not apply to the Authority provided that (i) the Authority adopts and the Board approves policies or regulations governing the acquisition, lease, or sale of surplus and real property consistent with the provisions of the above-referenced sections; and (ii) any acquisition, lease, or sale of real property valued in excess of $20 million shall be approved by the Governor.

Additionally, the provisions of §§

2.2-1117

and

53.1-47

shall not apply to the Authority.

History.

1981, c. 589; 1997, cc. 232, 488; 2012, cc. 846, 849; 2013, cc. 762, 794; 2015, cc. 175, 383.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

Acts 2015, cc. 175 and 383, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall develop policies or adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this act by January 1, 2017.”

Acts 2015, cc. 175 and 383, cl. 3 provides: “Prior to January 1, 2017, the Virginia Port Authority may exercise the authority granted by this act subject to the approval of the Secretary of Transportation.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 846 and 849 are identical, and added subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and deleted “and approved by the Department of General Services” following “Board of Commissioners” in the second sentence of subsection A, and added subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 175 and 383 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted “2.2-1150, and” and substituted “through” for “2.2-1154, and” preceding “2.2-1156” and in clause (i), inserted “policies or.”

§ 62.1-132.7.
Employment of personnel and legal counsel.

The Authority may appoint, employ, dismiss, and fix and pay compensation to employees, officers, agents, advisers, and consultants, including financial and technical advisers, engineers, and public accountants within and without the Commonwealth and the United States without regard to whether such employees are citizens of the United States. The Authority shall determine the duties and compensation of its employees, officers, agents, advisers, and consultants without the approval of any other agency or instrumentality.

The authority may retain legal counsel, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, to represent the Authority in rate cases and all other hearings, controversies, or matters involving the interests of the Authority.

History.

1981, c. 589; 1997, c. 232.

§ 62.1-132.8.
Consolidation of terminal operations.

The Authority shall effect consolidation of the water terminals of the several cities within the ports of the Commonwealth. It, specifically, shall bring about the centrally directed operation of all state-owned port facilities at Hampton Roads by such means as may prove necessary or desirable, not inconsistent with state law.

History.

1981, c. 589.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557 [see now §

33.2-1800

], is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 [see now §§

33.2-1803

and

33.2-1819

]. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-132.9.
Foreign trade zones.

The Authority is empowered to develop, maintain, and operate foreign trade zones under such terms and conditions as are or may be prescribed by law.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.10.
Publications of Authority.

The Authority may issue periodicals and carry and charge for advertising therein.

The Authority may compile and disseminate in a single publication all port charges, rules, and practices in effect at the several ports in the Commonwealth.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.11.
Police powers; penalties.

The Authority is empowered to adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations governing (i) the maximum and minimum speed limits of motor vehicles using Authority property, (ii) the kinds and sizes of vehicles which may be operated upon Authority property, (iii) materials which shall not be transported through or over Authority property, and (iv) other matters affecting the safety and security of Authority property. Such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law (i) after publication one time in full in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the affected property is located, and (ii) when posted where the public using such property may conveniently see them. Violation of any rule or regulation which would have been a violation of law or ordinance if committed on a public street or highway shall be tried and punished as if it had been committed on a public street or highway. Any other violation of such rules and regulations shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1981, c. 589.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 62.1-132.11:1.
Prevention and suppression of fire.

The Authority may take such steps as necessary, not inconsistent with other provisions of law, to prevent and suppress fires on the waters of Hampton Roads, its tributaries and other waters in the vicinity of Hampton Roads, and on property adjacent to such waters which is accessible to a fire boat. In furtherance of this purpose, the Authority may, out of such funds as may become available, purchase, equip, maintain, use, and provide and train a crew or crews for a fire boat or fire boats.

History.

1983, c. 303.

§ 62.1-132.11:2.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

62.1-132.11:2

, pertaining to the Maritime Incident Response Advisory Board, was derived from Acts 2000, c. 1035; 2010, c. 815.

§ 62.1-132.12.
Employment, jurisdiction, and power of special police officers.

The Authority may appoint and employ special police officers to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to §

62.1-132.11

on property owned, leased, or operated by the Authority or any of its subsidiaries. By agreement with the locality within which the property is located, the concurrent jurisdiction and authority of such special police, upon order entered of record by the circuit court for the locality, may be extended to a specific place or places in a locality outside the geographic boundaries of Authority property. Such special police officers shall have the powers vested in police officers under §§

15.2-1704

and

52-8

. Such special police officers may issue summons to appear, or arrest on view or on information without warrant as permitted by law, and conduct before the court of the city or county of competent jurisdiction any person violating, upon property under the control of the Authority, any rule or regulation of the Authority, any law of the Commonwealth, or any ordinance or regulation of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

The court or courts having jurisdiction for the trial of criminal offenses of the city or county wherein the offense was committed shall have jurisdiction to try persons charged with violating any such laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations. Fines and costs assessed or collected for violation of any such law, ordinance, rule, or regulation shall be paid into the Literary Fund.

History.

1981, c. 589; 2008, cc. 324, 529; 2015, cc. 74, 253.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 324 and 529 are identical, and inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 74 and 253 are identical, and substituted “property owned, leased, or operated by the Authority or any of its subsidiaries” for “Authority property” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A.

§ 62.1-132.12:1.
Agreements with private terminal operators.

The Authority may enter into agreements with private maritime cargo terminal operators that require services comparable to services provided by the Authority to permit special police officers appointed and employed by the Authority pursuant to §

62.1-132.12

to provide and enforce safety and security on the operator’s property. Such agreements shall require the private maritime cargo terminal operator to compensate the Authority for the direct and indirect costs of the services provided by the Authority.

History.

2006, c. 220.

§ 62.1-132.13.
Cooperation with federal agencies.

The Authority is empowered to cooperate with, and to act as an agent for, the United States of America or any agency, department, corporation or instrumentality thereof in the maintenance, development, improvement, and use of harbors and seaports of the Commonwealth, and in any other matter within the purposes, duties, and powers of the Authority.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.14.
Agreement of local cooperation with Corps of Engineers.

The Authority, in addition to such other state agencies as the Governor may designate, is empowered, on behalf of and as an agent for the Commonwealth, with the approval of the Governor and after review by the Attorney General, to enter into contractual agreements, known as agreements of local cooperation, developed and tendered by the United States Army Corps of Engineers for signature by local nonfederal interests. Specifically, the Authority and other agencies designated by the Governor may contract under such agreements:

To provide, free of cost to the United States, the fee simple title to lands, perpetual and/or temporary easements, rights of way and any other interest in lands for cut-off bends, the laying of pipelines, erection of dikes, sluiceways, spillways, dams, drains, deposit of dredged materials, and for other purposes, provided that the conveyance of fee simple title or perpetual easements in subaqueous beds of waterways of the Commonwealth shall require further authorization of the General Assembly;

To alter existing structures on such areas;

To simultaneously dredge designated areas not covered by the federal project when and where required;

To construct and maintain public wharves and public roads leading thereto;

To make contributions in money or property in lieu of providing disposal areas for dredged materials;

To hold the United States safe and harmless against claims for damages arising out of the project or work incident thereto;

To remove sewer pipes and submarine cables;

To construct and maintain marine railways for the public use; and

To provide or satisfy any other items or conditions of local cooperation as stipulated in the congressional document covering the particular project involved.

This section shall not be interpreted as limiting but as descriptive of the items of local cooperation, the accomplishment of which the Authority and other designated agencies are hereby authorized to bind themselves, subject to the lawful appropriation of funds required therefor; it being intended to authorize the Authority and other designated agencies to comply fully and completely with all of the items of local cooperation as contemplated by Congress and as stipulated in the congressional acts or documents concerned.

History.

1981, c. 589; 1982, c. 168.

§ 62.1-132.15.
Grants and loans from federal agencies.

The Authority may apply for and accept grants or loans of money or property from any federal agency for any purpose authorized in this chapter. It may expend or use such money or property in accordance with any directions, requirements, or conditions which may be imposed by the agency.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.16.
Fees and charges.

Under such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by law, the Authority may fix, alter, charge, and collect tolls, fees, rentals, and any other charges for the use of, or for services rendered by, any Authority facility. The Authority may impose, levy, and collect such other fees and charges as may assist in defraying the expenses of administration, maintenance, development, or improvement of the ports of the Commonwealth, their cargo handling facilities, and harbors.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.17.
Grants of funds and property.

Persons, counties, cities, and towns are hereby authorized to grant, and the Authority is empowered to accept, funds and property to use, within the scope of other powers and duties of the Authority, as stipulated by the grantor.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.18.
Acquisition of property.

The Authority is authorized to acquire, construct, maintain, equip, and operate marine terminals, port facilities, wharves, docks, ships, piers, quays, elevators, compressors, refrigeration storage plants, warehouses, and other structures necessary for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce. The Authority is further authorized to undertake or make arrangements for the dredging of approaches to each facility and the construction of shipping facilities and transportation facilities incident thereto. The Authority shall have the power to issue revenue bonds for such acquisitions and purposes.

When such facilities or equipment is acquired from any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, the Authority is authorized to give written assurances, including agreements to reconvey properties to such political subdivision, for the installment payments for any terminals, facility, or equipment thus acquired.

History.

1981, c. 589.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557 [see now §

33.2-1800

], is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 [see now §§

33.2-1803

and

33.2-1819

]. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-132.19.
Acquisition and lease of property.

Except as provided in subsection D, the Authority is empowered to rent, lease, buy, own, acquire, construct, reconstruct, and dispose of harbors, seaports, port facilities, and such property, whether real or personal, as it may find necessary or convenient and issue revenue bonds therefor without pledging the faith and credit of the Commonwealth.

The Authority may lease to another such part or all of its real or personal property for such period and upon such terms and conditions as the Authority may determine.

The Authority shall neither expend funds nor incur any indebtedness for any improvement, repair, maintenance, or addition to any real or personal property owned by anyone other than the Authority, the Commonwealth, or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, unless either (i) the use of such property is guaranteed to the Authority or the Commonwealth by a lease extending beyond the useful life of the improvement, repair, maintenance, addition, or new facility, or (ii) such expenditure or indebtedness is approved in writing by the Governor.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, neither the Commonwealth nor the Authority shall accept any unsolicited proposal under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.) or the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) regarding the ownership or operation of any seaport or port facility.

History.

1981, c. 589; 2013, cc. 762, 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and added the exception at the beginning of subsection A, and added subsection D.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557 [see now §

33.2-1800

], is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 [see now §§

33.2-1803

and

33.2-1819

]. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).